Utah statutes.
58-72-601.   Acupuncture license not authorizing medical practice -- Insurance payments.

Nothing in this chapter may be construed to permit the practice of medicine nor require direct payment from third party insurers directly to a person engaged in the practice of acupuncture.



Amended by Chapter 90, 2007 General Session

